Utah statutes.
31A-8-102.   Scope and purposes.
(1)  No person may operate an organization in this state without complying
with and obtaining a certificate of authority under this chapter.
(2)  The purposes of this chapter include to:
(a)  provide for the establishment of health maintenance organizations which
provide readily available, accessible, and quality comprehensive health care
to their enrollees;
(b)  provide for the establishment of limited health plans which provide
readily available, accessible, and quality care to their enrollees;
(c)  encourage the development of organizations as an alternative method of
health care delivery; and
(d)  assure that organizations offering health plans within this state are
financially and administratively sound and that these organizations are in
fact able to deliver the benefits as promised.
